Utah statutes.
53-3-214.5.   License or identification card checkoff for vision screening.

(1)  A person who applies for a license or identification card or a renewal of a license or identification card may designate a voluntary contribution for vision screening of $2.

(2)  This contribution shall be:

(a)  collected by the division;

(b)  treated as a voluntary contribution to Friends For Sight to provide blindness prevention education, screening, and treatment and not as a license fee; and

(c)  transferred to Friends For Sight at least monthly, less actual administrative costs associated with collecting and transferring the contributions.



Amended by Chapter 30, 2003 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 126, 2003 General Session

